Utah statutes.
53-3-216.   Change of address -- Duty of licensee to notify division within 10 days -- Change of name -- Proof necessary -- Method of giving notice by division.

(1)  If a person, after applying for or receiving a license, moves from the address named in the application or in the license certificate issued to him, the person shall within 10 days of moving, notify the division in a manner specified by the division of his new address and the number of any license certificate held by him.

(2)  If a person requests to change the surname on the applicant's license, the division shall issue a substitute license with the new name upon receiving an application and fee for a duplicate license and any of the following proofs of the applicant's full legal name:

(a)  an original or certified copy of the applicant's marriage certificate;

(b)  a certified copy of a court order under Title 42, Chapter 1, Change of Name, showing the name change;

(c)  an original or certified copy of a birth certificate issued by a government agency;

(d)  a certified copy of a divorce decree or annulment granted the applicant that specifies the name change requested; or

(e)  a certified copy of a divorce decree that does not specify the name change requested together with:

(i)  an original or certified copy of the applicant's birth certificate;

(ii)  the applicant's marriage license;

(iii)  a driver license record showing use of a maiden name; or

(iv)  other documentation the division finds acceptable.

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c), if a person has applied for and received a license certificate and is currently required to register as a sex offender in accordance with Title 77, Chapter 41, Sex and Kidnap Offender Registry:

(i)  the person's original license or renewal to an original license expires on the next birth date of the licensee beginning on July 1, 2006;

(ii)  the person shall surrender the person's license to the division on or before the licensee's next birth date beginning on July 1, 2006; and

(iii)  the person may apply for a license certificate with an expiration date identified in Subsection 53-3-205(7)(h) by:

(A)  furnishing proper documentation to the division as provided in Section 53-3-205; and

(B)  paying the fee for a license required under Section 53-3-105.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c), if a person has applied for and received a license certificate and is subsequently convicted of any offense listed in Subsection 77-41-102(16), the person shall surrender the license certificate to the division on the person's next birth date following the conviction and may apply for a license certificate with an expiration date identified in Subsection 53-3-205(7)(h) by:

(i)  furnishing proper documentation to the division as provided in Section 53-3-205; and

(ii)  paying the fee for a license required under Section 53-3-105.

(c)  A person who is unable to comply with the provisions of Subsection (3)(a) or (3)(b) because the person is in the custody of the Department of Corrections or the Division of Juvenile Justice Services, confined in a correctional facility not operated by or under contract with the Department of Corrections, or committed to a state mental facility, shall comply with the provisions of Subsection (3)(a) or (b) within 10 days of being released from confinement.

(4) (a)  If the division is authorized or required to give any notice under this chapter or other law regulating the operation of vehicles, the notice shall, unless otherwise prescribed, be given by:

(i)  personal delivery to the person to be notified; or

(ii)  deposit in the United States mail with postage prepaid, addressed to the person at his address as shown by the records of the division.

(b)  The giving of notice by mail is complete upon the expiration of four days after the deposit of the notice.

(c)  Proof of the giving of notice in either manner may be made by the certificate of any officer or employee of the division or affidavit of any person older than 18 years of age, naming the person to whom the notice was given and specifying the time, place, and manner of giving the notice.

(5)  The division may use state mailing or United States Postal Service information to:

(a)  verify an address on an application or on records of the division; and

(b)  correct mailing addresses in the division's records.

(6) (a)  A violation of the provisions of Subsection (1) is an infraction.

(b)  A person who knowingly fails to surrender a license certificate under Subsection (3) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

